
BY CHARLES DICKENS.


FIRST QUARTER.

There are not many people--and as it is desirable that a story-teller
and a story-reader should establish a mutual understanding as soon as
possible, I beg it to be noticed that I confine this observation neither
to young people nor to little people, but extend it to all conditions of
people: little and big, young and old: yet growing up, or already
growing down again--there are not, I say, many people who would care to
sleep in a church. I don't mean at sermon time in warm weather (when the
thing has actually been done, once or twice), but in the night, and
alone. A great multitude of persons will be violently astonished, I
know, by this position, in the broad bold Day. But it applies to Night.
It must be argued by night. And I will undertake to maintain it
successfully on any gusty winter's night appointed for the purpose, with
any one opponent chosen from the rest, who will meet me singly in an old
churchyard, before an old church door; and will previously empower me to
lock him in, if needful to his satisfaction, until morning.

For the night-wind has a dismal trick of wandering round and round a
building of that sort, and moaning as it goes; and of trying with its
unseen hand, the windows and the doors; and seeking out some crevices by
which to enter. And when it has got in; as one not finding what it
seeks, whatever that may be, it wails and howls to issue forth again;
and not content with stalking through the aisles, and gliding round and
round the pillars, and tempting the deep organ, soars up to the roof,
and strives to rend the rafters; then flings itself despairingly upon
the stones below, and passes, muttering, into the vaults. Ugh! Heaven
preserve us, sitting snugly round the fire! It has an awful voice, that
wind at midnight, singing in a church!

But, high up in the steeple! There the foul blast roars and whistles!
High up in the steeple, where it is free to come and go through many an
airy arch and loophole, and to twist and twine itself about the giddy
stair, and twirl the groaning weathercock, and make the very tower shake
and shiver!

High up in the steeple of an old church, far above the light and murmur
of the town and far below the flying clouds that shadow it, is the wild
and dreary place at night: and high up in the steeple of an old church,
dwelt the Chimes I tell of.

They were old Chimes, trust me. Centuries ago, these Bells had been
baptized by bishops: so many centuries ago, that the register of their
baptism was lost long, long before the memory of man, and no one knew
their names. They had had their Godfathers and Godmothers, these Bells
(for my part, by the way, I would rather incur the responsibility of
being Godfather to a Bell than a Boy), and had had their silver mugs, no
doubt, besides. But Time had mowed down their sponsors, and Henry the
Eighth had melted down their mugs; and they now hung, nameless and
mugless, in the church tower.

Not speechless, though. Far from it. They had clear, loud, lusty,
sounding voices, had these Bells; and far and wide they might be heard
upon the wind. Much too sturdy Chimes were they, to be dependent on the
pleasure of the wind, moreover; for, fighting gallantly against it when
it took an adverse whim, they would pour their cheerful notes into a
listening ear right royally; and bent on being heard, on stormy nights,
by some poor mother watching a sick child, or some lone wife whose
husband was at sea, they had been sometimes known to beat a blustering
Nor'Wester; ay, "all to fits," as Toby Veck said;--for though they chose
to call him Trotty Veck, his name was Toby, and nobody could make it
anything else either (except Tobias); he having been as lawfully
christened in his day as the bells had been in theirs, though with not
quite so much of solemnity or public rejoicing.

For my part, I confess myself of Toby Veck's belief, for I am sure he
had opportunities enough of forming a correct one. And whatever Toby
Veck said, I say. And I take my stand by Toby Veck, although he _did_
stand all day long (and weary work it was) just outside the church-door.
In fact he was a ticket-porter, Toby Veck, and waited there for jobs.

And a breezy, goose-skinned, blue-nosed, red-eyed, stony-toed,
tooth-chattering place it was to wait in, in the winter-time, as Toby
Veck well knew. The wind came tearing round the corner--especially the
east wind--as if it had sallied forth, express, from the confines of the
earth, to have a blow at Toby. And oftentimes it seemed to come upon him
sooner than it had expected, for bouncing round the corner, and passing
Toby, it would suddenly wheel round again, as if it cried "Why, here he
is!"

Toby was curious about the Bells because there were points of
resemblance between them and him. They hung there in all weathers, with
the wind and rain driving in upon them; facing only the outsides of all
the houses; never getting any nearer to the blazing fires that gleamed
and shone upon the windows or came puffing out of the chimney tops; and
incapable of participating in any of the good things that were
constantly being handed through the street doors and iron railings to
prodigious cooks. Being but a simple man, he invested the Bells with a
strange and solemn character. They were so mysterious, often heard and
never seen; so high up, so far off, so full of such a deep, strong
melody, that he regarded them with a species of awe; and sometimes when
he looked up at the dark arched windows in the tower, he half expected
to be beckoned to by something which was not a Bell, and yet was what he
heard so often sounding in the Chimes. For all this Toby scouted with
indignation a certain flying rumor that the Chimes were haunted, as
implying the possibility of their being connected with any Evil thing.
In short, they were very often in his ears, and very often in his
thoughts, but always in his good opinion; and he very often got such a
crick in his neck by staring with his mouth wide open, at the steeple
where they hung, that he was fain to take an extra trot or two,
afterward, to cure it.

The very thing he was in the act of doing one cold day, when the last
drowsy sound of Twelve o'clock, just struck, was humming like a
melodious monster of a Bee, and not by any means a busy Bee, all through
the steeple?

"Dinner time, eh!" said Toby, trotting up and down before the church.
"Ah!"

Toby's nose was very red, and his eyelids were very red, and he winked
very much, and his shoulders were very near his ears, and his legs were
very stiff, and altogether he was evidently a long way upon the frosty
side of cool.

"Dinner time, eh!" repeated Toby, using his right hand muffler like an
infantine boxing-glove, and punishing his chest for being cold.
"Ah-h-h-h!"

He took a silent trot, after that, for a minute or two.

"There's nothing," said Toby, "more regular in its coming round than
dinner time, and nothing less regular in its coming round than dinner.
That's the great difference between 'em. It's took me a long time to
find it out. I wonder whether it would be worth any gentleman's while,
now, to buy that obserwation for the Papers; or the Parliament!"

Tony was only joking, for he gravely shook his head in
self-depreciation.

"Why! Lord!" said Toby. "The Papers is full of obserwations as it is;
and so's the Parliament. Here's last week's paper, now;" taking a very
dirty one from his pocket, and holding it from him at arm's length;
"full of obserwations! Full of obserwations! I like to know the news as
well as any man," said Toby, slowly; folding it a little smaller, and
putting it in his pocket again: "but it almost goes against the grain
with me to read a paper now. It frightens me almost. I don't know what
we poor people are coming to. Lord send we may be coming to something
better in the New Year nigh upon us!"

"Why, father, father!" said a pleasant voice, hard by.

But Toby, not hearing it continued to trot backward and forward: musing
as he went, and talking to himself.

"It seems as if we can't go right, or do right, or be righted," said
Toby. "I hadn't much schooling, myself, when I was young; and I can't
make out whether we have any business on the face of the earth, or not.
Sometimes I think we must have--a little; and sometimes I think we must
be intruding. I get so puzzled sometimes that I am not even able to make
up my mind whether there is any good at all in us, or whether we are
born bad. We seem to do dreadful things; we seem to give a deal of
trouble; we are always being complained of and guarded against. One way
or another, we fill the papers. Talk of a New Year!" said Toby,
mournfully. "I can bear up as well as another man at most times; better
than a good many, for I am as strong as a lion, and all men an't; but
supposing it should really be that we have no right to a New
Year--supposing we really _are_ intruding----"

"Why, father, father!" said the pleasant voice again.

Toby heard it this time; started; stopped; and shortening his sight,
which had been directed a long way off as seeking for enlightenment in
the very heart of the approaching year, found himself face to face with
his own child, and looking close into her eyes.

Bright eyes they were. Eyes that would bear a world of looking in,
before their depth was fathomed. Dark eyes, that reflected back the eyes
which searched them; not flashingly or at the owner's will, but with a
clear, calm, honest, patient radiance, claiming kindred with that light
which Heaven called into being. Eyes that were beautiful and true, and
beaming with Hope. With Hope so young and fresh; with Hope so buoyant,
vigorous and bright, despite the twenty years of work and poverty on
which they had looked; that they became a voice to Trotty Veck, and
said: "I think we have some business here--a little!"

Trotty kissed the lips belonging to the eyes, and squeezed the blooming
face between his hands.

"Why, Pet," said Trotty. "What's to-do? I didn't expect you, to-day,
Meg."

"Neither did I expect to come, father," cried the girl, nodding her head
and smiling as she spoke. "But here I am! And not alone; not alone!"

"Why you don't mean to say," observed Trotty, looking curiously at a
covered basket which she carried in her hand, "that you----"

"Smell it, father dear," said Meg, "Only smell it!"

Trotty was going to lift up the cover at once, in a great hurry, when
she gayly interposed her hand.

"No, no, no," said Meg, with the glee of a child. "Lengthen it out a
little. Let me just lift up the corner; just the lit-tle ti-ny cor-ner,
you know," said Meg, suiting the action to the word with the utmost
gentleness, and speaking very softly, as if she were afraid of being
overheard by something inside the basket; "there. Now. What's that!"

Toby took the shortest possible sniff at the edge of the basket, and
cried out in a rapture:

"Why, it's hot!"

"It is burning hot!" cried Meg. "Ha, ha, ha! It's scalding hot!"

"Ha, ha, ha!" roared Toby, with a sort of kick. "It's scalding hot!"

"But what is it father?" said Meg. "Come! you haven't guessed what it
is. And you must guess what it is. I can't think of taking it out till
you guess what it is. Don't be in such a hurry! Wait a minute! A little
bit more of the cover. Now guess!"

Meg was in a perfect fright lest he should guess right too soon;
shrinking away, as she held the basket toward him; curling up her pretty
shoulders; stopping her ear with her hand, as if by so doing she could
keep the right word out of Toby's lips; and laughing softly the whole
time.

Meanwhile Toby, putting a hand on each knee, bent down his nose to the
basket, and took a long inspiration at the lid; the grin upon his
withered face expanded in the process, as if he were inhaling laughing
gas.

"Ah! It's very nice," said Toby. "It ain't--I suppose it ain't
Polonies?"

"No, no, no!" cried Meg, delighted. "Nothing like Polonies!"

"No," said Toby, after another sniff. "It's--it's mellower than
Polonies. It's very nice. It improves every moment. It's too decided for
Trotters. Ain't it?"

Meg was in ecstasy. He could _not_ have gone wider of the mark than
Trotters--except Polonies.

"Liver?" said Toby, communing with himself. "No. There's a mildness
about it that don't answer to liver. Pettitoes? No. It an't faint enough
for pettitoes. It wants the stringiness of Cocks' heads. And I know it
an't sausages. I'll tell you what it is. It's chitterlings!"

"No, it an't!" cried Meg, in a burst of delight "No, it an't!"

"Why, what am I a thinking of!" said Toby, suddenly recovering a
position as near the perpendicular as it was possible for him to assume.
"I shall forget my own name next. It's tripe!"

Tripe it was; and Meg, in high joy, protested he should say, in half a
minute more, it was the best tripe ever stewed.

"And so," said Meg, busying herself exultingly with her basket; "I'll
lay the cloth at once, father; for I have brought the tripe in a basin,
and tied the basin up in a pocket-handkerchief; and if I like to be
proud for once, and spread that for a cloth, and call it a cloth,
there's no law to prevent me; is there father?"

"Not that I know of, my dear," said Toby. "But they're always a bringing
up some new law or other."

"And according to what I was reading you in the paper the other day,
father; what the Judge said, you know; we poor people are supposed to
know them all. Ha, ha! What a mistake! My goodness me, how clever they
think us!"

"Yes, my dear," cried Trotty; "and they'd be very fond of any one of us
that _did_ know 'em all. He'd grow fat upon the work he'd get, that man,
and be popular with the gentlefolks in his neighborhood. Very much so!"

"He'd eat his dinner with an appetite, whoever he was, if it smelt like
this," said Meg, cheerfully. "Make haste, for there's a potato besides.
Where will you dine, father? On the Post, or on the Steps? Dear, dear,
how grand we are. Two places to choose from!"

"The steps to day, my Pet," said Trotty. "Steps in dry weather. Post in
wet. There's a great conveniency in the steps at all times, because of
the sitting down; but they're rheumatic in the damp."

"Then here," said Meg, clapping her hands, after a moment's bustle;
"here it is, all ready! And beautiful it looks! Come, father. Eat it
while it's hot. Come!"

Since his discovery of the contents of the basket, Trotty had been
standing looking at her--and had been speaking too--in an abstracted
manner, which showed that though she was the object of his thoughts and
eyes, to the exclusion even of tripe, he neither saw nor thought about
her as she was at that moment, but had before him some imaginary rough
sketch or drama of her future life. Roused, now, by her cheerful
summons, he shook off a melancholy shake of the head which was just
coming upon him, and trotted to her side. As he was stooping to sit
down, the Chimes rang.

"Amen!" said Trotty, pulling off his hat and looking up toward them.

"Amen to the Bells, father?" cried Meg.

"They broke in like a grace, my dear," said Trotty, taking his seat.
"They'd say a good one, I am sure, if they could. Many's the kind thing
they say to me."

"The Bells do, father!" laughed Meg, as she set the basin, and a knife
and fork before him. "Well!"

"Seem to, my Pet," said Trotty, falling to with great vigor. "And
where's the difference? If I hear 'em, what does it matter whether they
speak it or not? Why bless you, my dear," said Toby, pointing at the
tower with his fork, and becoming more animated under the influence of
dinner, "how often have I heard them bells say, 'Toby Veck, Toby Veck,
keep a good heart Toby! Toby Veck, Toby Veck, keep a good heart Toby!' A
million times? More!"

"Well, I never!" cried Meg.

She had, though--over and over again. For it was Toby's constant topic.

"When things is very bad," said Trotty; "very bad indeed, I mean; almost
at the worst; then it's 'Toby Veck, Toby Veck, job coming soon, Toby!
Toby Veck, Toby Veck, job coming soon, Toby!' That way."

"And it comes--at last, father," said Meg, with a touch of sadness in
her pleasant voice.

"Always," answered the unconscious Toby. "Never fails."

While this discourse was holding, Trotty made no pause in his attack
upon the savory meat before him, but cut and ate, and cut and drank, and
cut and chewed, and dodged about, from tripe to hot potato, and from hot
potato back again to tripe, with an unctuous and unflagging relish. But
happening now to look all round the street--in case anybody should be
beckoning from any door or window, for a porter--his eyes, in coming
back again, encountered Meg: sitting opposite to him, with her arms
folded; and only busy in watching his progress with a smile of
happiness.

"Why, Lord forgive me!" said Trotty, dropping his knife and fork. "My
love! Meg! why didn't you tell me what a beast I was?"

"Father?"

"Sitting here," said Trotty, in penitent explanation, "cramming and
stuffing, and gorging myself; and you before me there, never so much as
breaking your precious fast, nor wanting to, when----"

"But I have broken it, father," interposed his daughter, laughing, "all
to bits. I have had my dinner."

"Nonsense," said Trotty. "Two dinners in one day! It an't possible! You
might as well tell me that two New Year's Days will come together, or
that I have had a gold head all my life, and never changed it."

"I have had my dinner, father, for all that," said Meg, coming nearer to
him. "And if you'll go on with yours, I'll tell you how and where; and
how your dinner came to be brought; and--something else besides."

Toby still appeared incredulous; but she looked into his face with her
clear eyes, and laying her hand upon his shoulder, motioned him to go on
while the meat was hot. So Trotty took up his knife and fork again, and
went to work. But much more slowly than before, and shaking his head, as
if he were not at all pleased with himself.

"I had my dinner, father," said Meg, after a little hesitation,
"with--with Richard. His dinner-time was early; and as he brought his
dinner with him when he came to see me, we--we had it together, father."

Trotty said, "Oh!"--because she waited.

"And Richard says, father--" Meg resumed. Then stopped.

"What does Richard say, Meg?" asked Toby.

"Richard says, father--" Another stoppage.

"Richard's a long time saying it," said Toby.

"He says then, father," Meg continued, lifting up her eyes at last, and
speaking in a tremble, but quite plainly; "another year is nearly gone,
and where is the use of waiting on from year to year, when it is so
unlikely we shall ever be better off than we are now? He says we are
poor now, father, and we shall be poor then, but we are young now, and
years will make us old before we know it. He says that if we wait,
people in our condition, until we see our way quite clearly, the way
will be a narrow one indeed--the common way--the Grave, father."

A bolder man than Trotty Veck must needs have drawn upon his boldness
largely, to deny it. Trotty held his peace.

"And how hard, father, to grow old and die, and think we might have
cheered and helped each other! How hard in all our lives to love each
other; and to grieve, apart, to see each other working, changing,
growing old and gray. Even if I got the better of it, and forgot him
(which I never could), oh, father dear, how hard to have a heart so full
as mine is now, and live to have it slowly drained out every drop,
without the recollection of one happy moment of a woman's life, to stay
behind and comfort me, and make me better!"

Trotty sat quite still, Meg dried her eyes, and said more gayly: that is
to say, with here a laugh, and there a sob, and here a laugh and sob
together:

"So Richard says, father; as his work was yesterday made certain for
some time to come, and as I love him and have loved him fully three
years--ah! longer than that, if he knew it!--will I marry him on New
Year's Day; the best and happiest day, he says, in the whole year, and
one that is almost sure to bring good fortune with it. It's a short
notice, father--isn't it?--but I haven't my fortune to be settled, or my
wedding dresses to be made, like the great ladies, father, have I? And
he said so much, and said it in his way; so strong and earnest, and all
the time so kind and gentle; that I said I'd come and talk to you,
father. And as they paid the money for that work of mine this morning
(unexpectedly, I am sure!), and as you have fared very poorly for a
whole week, and as I couldn't help wishing there should be something to
make this day a sort of holiday to you as well as a dear and happy day
to me, father, I made a little treat and brought it to surprise you."

"And see how he leaves it cooling on the step!" said another voice.

It was the voice of the same Richard, who had come upon them unobserved,
and stood before the father and daughter; looking down upon them with a
face as glowing as the iron on which his stout sledge-hammer daily rung.
A handsome, well-made, powerful youngster he was; with eyes that
sparkled like the red-hot droppings from a furnace fire; black hair that
curled about his swarthy temples rarely; and a smile--a smile that bore
out Meg's eulogium on his style of conversation.

"See how he leaves it cooling on the step!" said Richard. "Meg don't
know what he likes. Not she!"

Trotty, all action and enthusiasm, immediately reached up his hand to
Richard, and was going to address him in a great hurry, when the
house-door opened without any warning, and a footman very nearly put his
foot in the tripe.

"Out of the vays here, will you! You must always go and be a-settin on
our steps, must you! You can't go and give a turn to none of the
neighbors never, can't you? _Will_ you clear the road, or won't you?"

Strictly speaking, the last question was irrelevant, as they had already
done it.

"What's the matter, what's the matter?" said the gentleman for whom the
door was opened; coming out of the house at that kind of light, heavy
pace--that peculiar compromise between a walk and jog-trot--with which a
gentleman upon the smooth down-hill of life, wearing creaking boots, a
watch-chain, and clean linen, _may_ come out of his house: not only
without any abatement of his dignity, but with an expression of having
important and wealthy engagements elsewhere. "What's the matter? What's
the matter?"

"You're always a-being begged, and prayed, upon your bended knees, you
are," said the footman with great emphasis to Trotty Veck, "to let our
door-steps be. Why don't you let 'em be? CAN'T you let 'em be?"

"There! That'll do, that'll do!" said the gentleman, "Halloa there!
Porter!" beckoning with his head to Trotty Veck, "Come here. What's
that? Your dinner?"

"Yes, sir," said Trotty, leaving it behind him in a corner.

"Don't leave it there!" exclaimed the gentleman. "Bring it here, bring
it here! So! this is your dinner, is it?"

"Yes, sir," repeated Trotty, looking with a fixed eye and a watery mouth
at the piece of tripe he had reserved for a last delicious tit-bit,
which the gentleman was now turning over and over on the end of a fork.

Two other gentlemen had come out with him. One was a low-spirited
gentleman of middle age, of a meagre habit, and a disconsolate face; who
kept his hands continually in the pockets of his scanty pepper-and-salt
trousers, very large and dog's-eared from that custom; and was not
particularly well brushed or washed. The other, a full sized, sleek,
well-conditioned gentleman, in a blue coat, with bright buttons, and a
white cravat. This gentleman had a very red face, as if an undue
proportion of the blood in his body were squeezed up into his head,
which perhaps accounted for his having also the appearance of being
rather cold about the heart.

He who had Toby's meat upon the fork called to the first one by the name
of Filer, and they both drew near together. Mr. Filer being exceedingly
short sighted, was obliged to go so close to the remnant of Toby's
dinner before he could make out what it was, that Toby's heart leaped up
into his mouth. But Mr. Filer didn't eat it.

"This is a description of animal food, Alderman," said Filer, making
little punches in it with a pencil-case, "commonly known to the laboring
population of this country by the name of tripe."

The Alderman laughed, and winked; for he was a merry fellow. Alderman
Cute. Oh, and a sly fellow too! A knowing fellow. Up to everything. Not
to be imposed upon. Deep in the people's hearts! He knew them, Cute did.
I believe you!

"But who eats tripe?" said Mr. Filer, looking round. "Tripe is without
an exception the least economical, and the most wasteful article of
consumption that the markets of this country can by possibility produce.
The loss upon a pound of tripe has been found to be, in the boiling,
seven-eighths of a fifth more than the loss upon a pound of any other
animal substance whatever. Tripe is more expensive, properly understood,
than the hot-house pine-apple. Taking into account the number of animals
slaughtered yearly within the bills of mortality alone; and forming a
low estimate of the quantity of tripe which the carcases of these
animals, reasonably well butchered, would yield--I find that the waste
on that amount of tripe, if boiled, would victual a garrison of five
hundred men for five months of thirty-one days each, and a February
over. The Waste, the Waste!"

Trotty stood aghast, and his legs shook under him. He seemed to have
starved a garrison of five hundred men with his own hand.

"Who eats tripe?" said Mr. Filer, warmly. "Who eats tripe?"

Trotty made a miserable bow.

"You do, do you?" said Mr. Filer. "Then I'll tell you something. You
snatch your tripe, my friend, out of the mouths of widows and orphans."

"I hope not, sir," said Trotty, faintly. "I'd sooner die of want!"

"Divide the amount of tripe before-mentioned, Alderman," said Mr. Filer,
"by the estimated number of existing widows and orphans, and the result
will be one pennyweight of tripe to each. Not a grain is left for that
man. Consequently, he's a robber."

Trotty was so shocked that it gave him no concern to see the Alderman
finish the tripe himself. It was a relief to get rid of it, anyhow.

"And what do you say?" asked the Alderman, jocosely, of the red-faced
gentleman in the blue coat. "You have heard friend Filer. What do _you_
say?"

"What's it possible to say?" returned the gentleman. "What _is_ to be
said? Who can take any interest in a fellow like this," meaning Trotty,
"in such degenerate times as these? Look at him! What an object! The
good old times, the grand old times, the great old times! _Those_ were
the times for a bold peasantry, and all that sort of thing. Those were
the times for every sort of thing, in fact. There's nothing now-a-days.
Ah!" sighed the red-faced gentleman. "The good old times, the good old
times!"

It is possible that poor Trotty's faith in these very vague Old Times
was not entirely destroyed, for he felt vague enough, at that moment.
One thing, however, was plain to him, in the midst of his distress; to
wit, that however these gentlemen might differ in details, his
misgivings of that morning, and of many other mornings, were well
founded. "No, no. We can't go right or do right," thought Trotty in
despair. "There is no good in us. We are born bad!"

But Trotty had a father's heart within him; which had somehow got into
his breast in spite of this decree; and he could not bear that Meg, in
the blush of her brief joy, should have her fortune read by these wise
gentlemen. "God help her," thought poor Trotty. "She will know it soon
enough."

He anxiously signed, therefore, to the young smith, to take her away.
But he was so busy, talking to her softly at a little distance, that he
only became conscious of this desire, simultaneously with Alderman Cute.
Now, the Alderman had not yet had his say, but _he_ was a philosopher,
too--practical though! Oh, very practical!--and, as he had no idea of
losing any portion of his audience, he cried "Stop!"

Trotty took Meg's hand and drew it through his arm. He didn't seem to
know what he was doing though.

"Your daughter, eh?" said the Alderman, chucking her familiarly under
the chin.

"And you're making love to her, are you?" said Cute to the young smith.

"Yes," returned Richard quickly, for he was nettled by the question.
"And we are going to be married on New Year's Day."

"What do you mean?" cried Filer sharply. "Married!"

"Why, yes, we were thinking of it. Master," said Richard. "We're rather
in a hurry you see, in case it should be Put Down first."

"Ah!" cried Filer, with a groan. "Put _that_ down indeed. Alderman, and
you'll do something. Married! Married!! The ignorance of the first
principles of political economy on the part of these people; their
improvidence; their wickedness is by Heavens! enough to--Now look at
that couple, will you!"

Well! They were worth looking at. And marriage seemed as reasonable and
fair a deed as they need have in contemplation.

"A man may live to be as old as Methuselah," said Mr. Filer, "and may
labor all his life for the benefit of such people as those; and may heap
up facts on figures, facts on figures, facts on figures, mountains high
and dry; and he can no more hope to persuade 'em that they have no right
or business to be married than he can hope to persuade 'em that they
have no earthly right or business to be born. And _that_ we know they
haven't. We reduced that to a mathematical certainty long ago!"

"Come here, my girl!" said Alderman Cute.

The young blood of her lover had been mounting, wrathfully, within the
last few minutes; and he was indisposed to let her come. But, setting a
constraint upon himself, he came forward with a stride as Meg approached
and stood beside her. Trotty kept her hand within his arm still, but
looked from face to face as wildly as a sleeper in a dream.

"Now, I'm going to give you a word or two of good advice, my girl," said
the Alderman, in his nice easy way. "It's my place to give advice, you
know, because I'm a Justice. You know I'm a Justice, don't you?"

Meg timidly said, "Yes." But everybody knew Alderman Cute was a Justice!
Oh dear, so active a Justice always! Who such a mote of brightness in
the public eye, as Cute!

"You are going to be married, you say," pursued the Alderman. "Very
unbecoming and indelicate in one of your sex! But never mind that.
After you're married, you'll quarrel with your husband, and come to be a
distressed wife. You may think not; but you will, because I tell you so.
Now, I give you fair warning, that I have made up my mind to Put
distressed wives Down. So, don't be brought before me. You'll have
children--boys. Those boys will grow up bad, of course, and run wild in
the streets without shoes or stockings. Mind, my young friend! I'll
convict 'em summarily every one, for I am determined to Put boys without
shoes or stockings, Down. Perhaps your husband will die young (most
likely) and leave you with a baby. Then you'll be turned out of doors,
and wander up and down the streets. Now don't wander near me, my dear,
for I am resolved to Put all wandering mothers Down. All young mothers,
of all sorts and kinds, it's my determination to Put Down. Don't think
to plead illness as an excuse with me; or babies as an excuse with me;
for all sick persons and young children (I hope you know the
church-service, but I'm afraid not) I am determined to Put Down. And if
you attempt, desperately and ungratefully, and impiously, and
fraudulently attempt, to drown yourself, or hang yourself, I'll have no
pity on you, for I have made up my mind to Put all suicide Down! If
there is one thing," said the Alderman, with his self-satisfied smile,
"on which I can be said to have made up my mind more than on another, it
is to Put suicide Down. So don't try it on. That's the phrase, isn't it!
Ha, ha! now we understand each other."

Toby knew not whether to be agonized or glad, to see that Meg had turned
deadly white, and dropped her lover's hand.

"As for you, you dull dog," said the Alderman, turning with even
increased cheerfulness and urbanity to the young smith, "what are you
thinking of being married for? What do you want to be married for, you
silly fellow? If I was a fine, young, strapping chap like you, I should
be ashamed of being milksop enough to pin myself to a woman's
apron-strings! Why, she'll be an old woman before you're a middle-aged
man! And a pretty figure you'll cut then, with a draggle-tailed wife and
a crowd of squalling children crying after you wherever you go!"

Oh, he knew how to banter the common people, Alderman Cute!

"There! Go along with you," said the Alderman, "and repent. Don't make
such a fool of yourself as to get married on New Year's Day. You'll
think very differently of it, long before next New Year's Day: a trim
young fellow like you, with all the girls looking after you. There! Go
along with you!"

They went along. Not arm in arm, or hand in hand, or interchanging
bright glances; but she in tears; he gloomy and down-looking. Were these
the hearts that had so lately made old Toby's leap up from its
faintness? No, no. The Alderman (a blessing on his head!) had Put _them_
Down.

"As you happen to be here," said the Alderman to Toby, "you shall carry
a letter for me. Can you be quick? You're an old man."

Toby, who had been looking after Meg, quite stupidly, made shift to
murmur out that he was very quick, and very strong.

"How old are you?" inquired the Alderman.

"I am over sixty, sir," said Toby.

"Oh! This man's a great deal past the average age, you know," cried Mr.
Filer, breaking in as if his patience would bear some trying, but this
was really carrying matters a little too far.

"I feel I'm intruding, sir," said Toby. "I--I misdoubted it this
morning. Oh dear me!"

The Alderman cut him short by giving him the letter from his pocket.
Toby would have got a shilling too; but Mr. Filer clearly showing that
in that case he would rob a certain given number of persons of
ninepence-half-penny a-piece, he only got sixpence; and thought himself
very well off to get that.

Then the Alderman gave an arm to each of his friends, and walked off in
high feather; but, he immediately came hurrying back alone, as if he had
forgotten something.

"Porter!" said the Alderman.

"Sir!" said Toby.

"Take care of that daughter of yours. She's much too handsome."

"Even her good looks are stolen from somebody or other I suppose,"
thought Toby, looking at the sixpence in his hand, and thinking of the
tripe. "She's been and robbed five hundred ladies of a bloom a-piece, I
shouldn't wonder. It's very dreadful!"

"She's much too handsome, my man," repeated the Alderman. "The chances
are, that she'll come to no good, I clearly see. Observe what I say.
Take care of her!" With which, he hurried off again.

"Wrong every way. Wrong every way!" said Trotty clasping his hands.
"Born bad. No business here!"

The Chimes came clashing in upon him as he said the last words. Full,
loud, and sounding--but with no encouragement. No, not a drop.

"The tune's changed," cried the old man, as he listened. "There's not a
word of all that fancy in it. Why should there be? I have no business
with the New Year nor with the old one neither. Let me die!"

Still the Bells, pealing forth their changes, made the very air spin.
Put 'em down. Put 'em down! Good old Times, Good old Times! Facts and
Figures, Facts and Figures! Put 'em down, Put 'em down! If they said
anything they said this, until the brain of Toby reeled.

He pressed his bewildered head between his hands as if to keep it from
splitting asunder. A well-timed action, as it happened; for finding the
letter in one of them, and being by that means reminded of his charge,
he fell, mechanically, into his usual trot, and trotted off.


SECOND QUARTER.

The letter Toby had received from Alderman Cute, was addressed to a
great man in the great district of the town. The greatest district of
the town. It must have been the greatest district of the town, because
it was commonly called "the world" by its inhabitants.

The Year was Old, that day. The patient Year had lived through the
reproaches and misuses of its slanderers, and faithfully performed its
work. Spring, summer, autumn, winter. It had labored through the
destined round, and now laid down its weary head to die.

Trotty had no portion, to his thinking, in the New Year or the Old.

"Put 'em down. Put 'em down! Facts and Figures, Facts and Figures! Good
old Times, Good old Times! Put 'em down, Put 'em down!"--his trot went
to that measure, and would fit itself to nothing else.

But, even that one, melancholy as it was, brought him, in due time, to
the end of his journey. To the mansion of Sir Joseph Bowley, Member of
Parliament.

The door was opened by a Porter. Such a Porter! Not of Toby's order.
Quite another thing. His place was the ticket, though; not Toby's.

This Porter underwent some hard panting before he could speak; having
breathed himself by coming incautiously out of his chair, without first
taking time to think about it and compose his mind. When he had found
his voice--which it took him some time to do, for it was a long way off
and hidden under a load of meat--he said in a fat whisper:

"Who's it from?"

Toby told him.

"You're to take it in yourself," said the Porter, pointing to a room at
the end of a long passage, opening from the hall. "Everything goes
straight in, on this day of the year. You're not a bit too soon; for the
carriage is at the door now, and they have only come to town for a
couple of hours, a'purpose."

Toby wiped his feet (which were quite dry already) with great care, and
took the way pointed out to him, observing as he went that it was an
awfully grand house, but hushed and covered up, as if the family were in
the country. Knocking at the room door, he was told to enter from
within; and doing so found himself in a spacious library, where, at a
table strewn with files and papers, were a stately lady in a bonnet, and
a not very stately gentleman in black, who wrote from her dictation;
while another, and an older, and a much statelier gentleman, whose hat
and cane were on the table, walked up and down, with one hand in his
breast, and looked complacently from time to time at his own picture--a
full length; a very full length--hanging over the fire-place.

"What is this?" said the last-named gentleman. "Mr. Fish, will you have
the goodness to attend?"

Mr. Fish begged pardon, and taking the letter from Toby, handed it, with
great respect.

"From Alderman Cute, Sir Joseph."

"Is this all? Have you nothing else, Porter?" inquired Sir Joseph.

Toby replied in the negative.

"You have no bill or demand upon me--my name is Bowley, Sir Joseph
Bowley--of any kind from anybody, have you?" said Sir Joseph. "If you
have, present it. There is a cheque-book by the side of Mr. Fish. I
allow nothing to be carried into the New Year. Every description of
account is settled in this house at the close of the old one. So that if
death was to--to--"

"To cut," suggested Mr. Fish.

"To sever, sir," returned Sir Joseph, with great asperity, "the cord of
existence--my affairs would be found, I hope, in a state of
preparation."

"My dear Sir Joseph!" said the lady, who was greatly younger than the
gentleman. "How shocking!"

"My Lady Bowley," returned Sir Joseph, floundering now and then, as in
the great depth of his observations, "at this season of the year we
should think of--of--ourselves. We should look into our--our accounts.
We should feel that every return of so eventful a period in human
transactions involves matter of deep moment between a man and his--and
his banker."

Sir Joseph delivered these words as if he felt the full morality of what
he was saying, and desired that even Trotty should have an opportunity
of being improved by such discourse. Possibly he had this end before him
in still forbearing to break the seal of the letter, and in telling
Trotty to wait where he was a minute.

"I _am_ the Poor Man's Friend," observed Sir Joseph, glancing at the
poor man present. "As such I may be taunted. As such I have been
taunted. But I ask no other title."

"Bless him for a noble gentleman!" thought Trotty.

"I don't agree with Cute here, for instance," said Sir Joseph, holding
out the letter. "I don't agree with the Filer party. I don't agree with
any party. My friend, the Poor Man, has no business with any thing of
that sort, and nothing of that sort has any business with him. My
friend, the Poor Man, in my district, is my business. No man or body of
men has any right to interfere between my friend and me. That is the
ground I take. I assume a--a paternal character toward my friend. I say,
'My good fellow, I will treat you paternally.'"

With that great sentiment, he opened the Alderman's letter, and read it.

"Very polite and attentive, I am sure!" exclaimed Sir Joseph. "My lady,
the Alderman is so obliging as to remind me that he has had 'the
distinguished honor'--he is very good--of meeting me at the house of our
mutual friend Deedles, the banker, and he does me the favor to inquire
whether it will be agreeable to me to have Will Fern put down. He came
up to London, it seems, to look for employment (trying to better
himself--that's his story), and being found at night asleep in a shed,
was taken into custody, and carried next morning before the Alderman.
The Alderman observes (very properly) that he is determined to put this
sort of thing down, and that if it will be agreeable to me to have Will
Fern put down, he will be happy to begin with him."

"Let him be made an example of, by all means," returned the lady. "Last
winter, when I introduced pinking and eyelet-holing among the men and
boys in the village as a nice evening employment, and had the lines,


     Oh let us love our occupations,
     Bless the squire and his relations,
     Live upon our daily rations,
     And always know our proper stations,


set to music on the new system, for them to sing the while; this very
Fern--I see him now--touched that hat of his, and said, 'I humbly ask
your pardon, my lady, but _an't_ I something different from a great
girl?' I expected it, of course; who can expect anything but insolence
and ingratitude from that class of people? That is not to the purpose,
however. Sir Joseph! Make an example of him!"

Trotty, who had long ago relapsed, and was very low-spirited, stepped
forward with a rueful face to take the letter Sir Joseph held out to
him.

"You have heard, perhaps," said Sir Joseph, oracularly, "certain remarks
into which I have been led respecting the solemn period of time at which
we have arrived, and the duty imposed upon us of settling our affairs,
and being prepared. Now, my friend, can you lay your hand upon your
heart, and say that you also have made preparation for a New Year?"

"I am afraid, sir," stammered Trotty, looking meekly at him, "that I am
a--a--little behind-hand with the world."

"Behind-hand with the world!" repeated Sir Joseph Bowley, in a tone of
terrible distinctness.

"I am afraid, sir," faltered Trotty, "that there's a matter of ten or
twelve shillings owing to Mrs. Chickenstalker."

"To Mrs. Chickenstalker!" repeated Sir Joseph, in the same tone as
before.

"A shop, sir," exclaimed Toby, "in the general line. Also a--a little
money on account of rent. A very little, sir. It oughtn't to be owing, I
know, but we have been hard put to it, indeed!"

Sir Joseph looked at his lady, and at Mr. Fish, and at Trotty, one after
another, twice all round. He then made a despondent gesture with both
hands at once, as if he gave the thing up altogether.

"How a man, even among this improvident and impracticable race; an old
man; a man grown grey; can look a New Year in the face with his affairs
in this condition; how he can lie down on his bed at night, and get up
again in the morning, and--There!" he said, turning his back on Trotty.

"Take the letter! Take the letter!"

"I heartily wish it was otherwise, sir," said Trotty, anxious to excuse
himself. "We have been tried very hard."

Sir Joseph still repeating "Take the letter, take the letter!" and Mr.
Fish not only saying the same thing, but giving additional force to the
request by motioning the bearer to the door, he had nothing for it but
to make his bow and leave the house. And in the street, poor Trotty
pulled his worn old hat down on his head to hide the grief he felt at
getting no hold on the New Year, anywhere.

He didn't even lift his hat to look up at the Bell tower when he came to
the old church on his return. He halted there a moment, from habit; and
knew that it was growing dark and that the steeple rose above him
indistinct and faint in the murky air. He knew, too, that the Chimes
would ring immediately, and that they sounded to his fancy, at such a
time, like voices in the clouds. But he only made the more haste to
deliver the Alderman's letter and get out of the way before they began;
for he dreaded to hear them tagging "Friends and Fathers, Friends and
Fathers," to the burden they had rung out last.

Toby discharged himself of his commission, therefore, with all possible
speed and set off trotting homeward. But what with his pace, which was
at best an awkward one in the street; and what with his hat, which
didn't improve it; he trotted against somebody in less than no time and
was sent staggering out into the road.

"I beg your pardon, I'm sure!" said Trotty, pulling up his hat in great
confusion, and between the hat and the torn lining, fixing his head
into a kind of bee-hive. "I hope I haven't hurt you."

As to hurting anybody, Toby was not such an absolute Samson, but that he
was much more likely to be hurt himself; and indeed he had flown out
into the road like a shuttle-cock. He had such an opinion of his own
strength, however, that he was in real concern for the other party, and
said again,

"I hope I haven't hurt you?"

The man against whom he had run, a sun-browned, sinewy, country-looking
man, with grizzled hair and a rough chin, stared at him for a moment, as
if he suspected him to be in jest. But, satisfied of his good faith, he
answered:

"No, friend. You have not hurt me."

"Nor the child, I hope?" said Trotty.

"Nor the child," returned the man. "I thank you kindly."

As he said so, he glanced at a little girl he carried in his arms,
asleep, and shading her face with the long end of the poor handkerchief
he wore about his throat, went slowly on.

The tone in which he said "I thank you kindly," penetrated Trotty's
heart. He was so jaded and foot sore, and so soiled with travel, and
looked about him so forlorn and strange, that it was a comfort to him to
be able to thank anyone, no matter for how little. Toby stood gazing
after him as he plodded wearily away, with the child's arm clinging
round his neck.

At the figure in the worn shoes--now the very shade and ghost of
shoes--rough leather leggings, common frock and broad slouched hat,
Trotty stood gazing, blind to the whole street. And at the child's arm,
clinging round its neck.

Before he merged into the darkness the traveler stopped, and looking
round and seeing Trotty standing there yet, seemed undecided whether to
return or go on. After doing first the one and then the other, he came
back, and Trotty went half way to meet him.

"You can tell me, perhaps," said the man with a faint smile, "and if you
can I am sure will, and I'd rather ask you than another--where Alderman
Cute lives."

"Close at hand," replied Toby, "I'll show you his house with pleasure."

"I was to have gone to him elsewhere to-morrow," said the man,
accompanying Toby, "but I am uneasy under suspicion, and want to clear
myself and to be free to go and seek my bread--I don't know where. So,
maybe he'll forgive my going to his house to-night."

"It's impossible," cried Toby with a start, "that your name's Fern!"

"Eh!" cried the other, turning on him in astonishment.

"Fern! Will Fern!" said Trotty.

"That's my name," replied the other.

"Why, then," cried Trotty, seizing him by the arm and looking cautiously
round, "for Heaven's sake don't go to him! Don't go to him! He'll put
you down as sure as ever you were born. Here, come up this alley, and
I'll tell you what I mean. Don't go to _him_."

His new acquaintance looked as if he thought him mad, but he bore him
company, nevertheless. When they were shrouded from observation, Trotty
told him what he knew, and what character he had received, and all about
it.

The subject of his history listened to it with a calmness that surprised
him. He did not contradict or interrupt it once. He nodded his head now
and then--more in corroboration of an old and worn-out story, it
appeared, than in refutation of it; and once or twice threw back his
hat, and passed his freckled hand over a brow, where every furrow he
had ploughed seemed to have set its image in little. But he did no more.

"It's true enough in the main," he said, "master, I could sift grain
from the husk here and there, but let it be as 'tis. What odds? I have
gone against his plans; to my misfortun'. I can't help it; I should do
the like to-morrow. As to character, them gentlefolks will search and
search, and pry and pry, and have it as free from spot or speck in us,
afore they'll help us to a dry good word!--Well! I hope they don't lose
good opinion as easy as we do, or their lives is strict indeed, and
hardly worth the keeping. For myself, master, I never took with that
hand"--holding it before him--"what wasn't my own; and never held it
back from work, however hard, or poorly paid. Whoever can deny it, let
him chop it off! But when work won't maintain me like a human creetur;
when my living is so bad, that I am Hungry, out of doors and in; when I
see a whole working life begin that way, go on that way, and end that
way, without a chance or change; then I say to the gentlefolks 'Keep
away from me! Let my cottage be. My doors is dark enough without your
darkening of 'em more. Don't look for me to come up into the Park to
help the show when there's a Birthday, or a fine Speechmaking, or what
not. Act your Plays and Games without me, and be welcome to 'em and
enjoy 'em. We've now to do with one another. I'm best let alone!'"

Seeing that the child in his arms had opened her eyes, and was looking
about in wonder, he checked himself to say a word or two of foolish
prattle in her ear, and stand her on the ground beside him. Then slowly
winding one of her long tresses round and round his rough forefinger
like a ring, while she hung about his dusty leg, he said to Trotty,

"I'm not a cross-grained man by natur', I believe; and easy satisfied,
I'm sure. I bear no ill will against none of 'em. I only want to live
like one of the Almighty's creeturs. I can't--I don't--and so there's a
pit dug between me, and them that can and do. There's others like me.
You might tell 'em off by hundreds and by thousands, sooner than by
ones."

Trotty knew that he spoke the truth in this, and shook his head to
signify as much.

"I've got a bad name this way," said Fern; "and I'm not likely, I'm
afeared, to get a better. 'Tan't lawful to be out of sorts, and I AM out
of sorts, though God knows, I'd sooner bear a cheerful spirit if I
could. Well! I don't know as this Alderman could hurt _me_ much by
sending me to gaol; but without a friend to speak a word for me, he
might do it; and you see--!" pointing downward with his finger, at the
child.

He sunk his voice so low, and gazed upon her with an air so stern and
strange, that Toby, to divert the current of his thoughts, inquired if
his wife were living.

"I never had one," he returned, shaking his head. "She's my brother's
child: a orphan. Nine year old, though you'd hardly think it; but she's
tired and worn out now. They'd have taken care on her in the
Union--eight and twenty mile away from where we live--between four walls
(as they took care of my old father when he couldn't work no more,
though he didn't trouble 'em long); but I took her instead, and she's
lived with me ever since. Her mother had a friend once, in London here.
We are trying to find her, and to find work too; but it's a large place.
Never mind. More room for us to walk about in, Lilly!"

Meeting the child's eyes with a smile which melted Toby more than tears,
he shook him by the hand.

"I don't so much as know your name," he said, "but I've opened my heart
free to you, for I'm thankful to you; with good reason. I'll take your
advice and keep clear of this--"

"Justice," suggested Toby.

"Ah!" he said. "If that's the name they give him. This Justice. And
to-morrow will try whether there's better fortun' to be met with
somewheres near London. Goodnight. A Happy New Year!"

"Stay!" cried Trotty, catching at his hand, as he relaxed his grip.
"Stay! The New Year never can be happy to me, if we part like this. The
New Year can never be happy to me, if I see the child and you go
wandering away, you don't know where, without a shelter for your heads.
Come home with me! I'm a poor man, living in a poor place; but I can
give you lodging for one night and never miss it. Come home with me!
Here! I'll take her!" cried Trotty, lifting up the child. "A pretty one!
I'd carry twenty times her weight, and never know I'd got it. Tell me if
I go too quick for you. I'm very fast. I always was!" Trotty said this,
taking about six of his trotting paces to one stride of his fatigued
companion; and with his thin legs quivering again, beneath the load he
bore.

"Down the Mews here, Uncle Will, and step at the black door, with 'T.
Veck, Ticket Porter,' wrote upon a board; and here we are, and here we
go, and here we are indeed, my precious Meg, surprising you!"

With which words Trotty, in a breathless state, set the child down
before his daughter in the middle of the floor. The little visitor
looked once at Meg; and doubting nothing in that face, but trusting
everything she saw there; ran into her arms.

"Here we are, and here we go!" cried Trotty, running round the room and
choking audibly. "Here, Uncle Will, here's a fire you know! Why don't
you come to the fire? Oh here we are and here we go! Meg, my precious
darling, where's the kettle? Here it is and here it goes, and it'll bile
in no time!"

Trotty really had picked up the kettle somewhere or other in the course
of his wild career, and now put it on the fire; while Meg, seating the
child in a warm corner, knelt down on the ground before her, and pulled
off her shoes, and dried her wet feet on a cloth. Ay, and she laughed at
Trotty too--so pleasantly, so cheerfully, that Trotty could have blessed
her where she kneeled; for he had seen that, when they entered, she was
sitting by the fire in tears.

"Why, father!" said Meg. "You're crazy to-night, I think. I don't know
what the Bells would say to that."

Meg looked toward him and saw that he had elaborately stationed himself
behind the chair of their male visitor, where with many mysterious
gestures he was holding up the six-pence he had earned.

"I see, my dear," said Trotty, "as I was coming in, half an ounce of tea
lying somewhere on the stairs; and I'm pretty sure there was a bit of
bacon too. As I don't remember where it was exactly, I'll go myself and
try to find 'em."

With this inscrutable artifice, Toby withdrew to purchase the viands he
had spoken of, for ready money, at Mrs. Chickenstalker's; and presently
came back, pretending that he had not been able to find them, at first
in the dark.

"But here they are at last," said Trotty, setting out the tea things,
"all correct! I was pretty sure it was tea and a rasher. So it is. Meg
my pet, if you'll just make the tea, while your unworthy father toasts
the bacon, we shall be ready immediate. It's a curious circumstance,"
said Trotty, proceeding in his cookery, with the assistance of the
toasting-fork, "curious, but well known to my friends, that I never
care, myself, for rashers, nor for tea. I like to see other people enjoy
'em," said Trotty, speaking very loud to impress the fact upon his
guest, "but to me, as food, they are disagreeable."

Yet Trotty sniffed the savor of the hissing bacon--ah!--as if he liked
it; and when he poured the boiling water in the tea-pot, looked lovingly
down into the depths of that snug caldron, and suffering the fragrant
steam to curl about his nose, and wreathe his head and face in a thick
cloud. However, for all this, he neither ate nor drank, except at the
very beginning, a mere morsel for form's sake, which he appeared to eat
with infinite relish, but declared was perfectly uninteresting to him.

"Now, I'll tell you what," said Trotty after tea. "The little one, she
sleeps with Meg, I know."

"With good Meg!" cried the child, caressing her. "With Meg."

"That's right," said Trotty. "And I shouldn't wonder if she'll kiss
Meg's father, won't she? _I_'m Meg's father."

Mightily delighted Trotty was, when the child went timidly toward him,
and having kissed him, fell back upon Meg again.

Meg looked toward their guest, who leaned upon her chair, and with his
face turned from her, fondled the child's head, half hidden in her lap.

"To be sure," said Toby. "To be sure! I don't know what I am rambling on
about, to-night. My wits are wool-gathering, I think. Will Fern, you
come along with me. You're tired to death, and broken down for want of
rest. You come along with me."

The hand released from the child's hair, had fallen, trembling, into
Trotty's hand. So Trotty, talking without intermission, led him out as
tenderly and easily as if he had been a child himself.

Returning before Meg, he listened for an instant at the door of her
little chamber; an adjoining room. The child was murmuring a simple
Prayer before lying down to sleep; and when she had remembered Meg's
name, "Dearly, Dearly"--so her words ran--Trotty heard her stop and ask
for his.

It was some short time before the foolish little old fellow could
compose himself to mend the fire, and draw his chair to the warm hearth.
But when he had done so, and had trimmed the light, he took his
newspaper from his pocket and began to read. Carelessly at first, and
skimming up and down the columns; but with an earnest and a sad
attention, very soon.

For this same dreaded paper re-directed Trotty's thoughts into the
channel they had taken all that day, and which the day's events had so
marked out and shaped. His interest in the two wanderers had set him on
another course of thinking, and a happier one, for the time; but being
alone again, and reading of the crimes and violences of the people, he
relapsed into his former train.

"It's too true, all I've heard to-day," Toby muttered; "too just, too
full of proof. We're Bad!"

The Chimes took up the words so suddenly--burst out so loud, and clear,
and sonorous--that the Bells seemed to strike him in his chair.

And what was that, they said?

"Toby Veck, Toby Veck, waiting for you Toby! Toby Veck, Toby Veck,
waiting for you Toby! Come and see us, come and see us, Drag him to us,
drag him to us, Haunt and hunt him, haunt and hunt him, Break his
slumbers, break his slumbers! Toby Veck, Toby Veck, door open wide Toby,
Toby Veck, Toby Veck, door open wide Toby--" then fiercely back to their
impetuous strain again, and ringing in the very bricks and plaster on
the walls.

Toby listened. Fancy, fancy! His remorse for having run away from them
that afternoon! No, no. Nothing of the kind. Again, again, and yet a
dozen times again. "Haunt and hunt him, haunt and hunt him, Drag him to
us, drag him to us!" Deafening the whole town!

"Meg," said Trotty, softly; tapping at her door. "Do you hear anything?"

"I hear the Bells, father. Surely they're very loud to-night."

"Is she asleep?" said Toby, making an excuse for peeping in.

"So peacefully and happily! I can't leave her yet though, father. Look
how she holds my hand!"

"Meg!" whispered Trotty. "Listen to the Bells!"

She listened, with her face toward him all the time. But it underwent no
change. She didn't understand them.

Trotty withdrew, resumed his seat by the fire, and once more listened by
himself. He remained here a little time.

It was impossible to bear it; their energy was dreadful.

"If the tower-door is really open," said Toby, hastily laying aside his
apron, but never thinking of his hat, "what's to hinder me from going up
in the steeple and satisfying myself? If it's shut, I don't want any
other satisfaction. That's enough."

He was pretty certain as he slipped out quietly into the street that he
should find it shut and locked, for he knew the door well, and had so
rarely seen it open, that he couldn't reckon above three times in all.
It was a low-arched portal outside the church, in a dark nook behind a
column; and had such great iron hinges, and such a monstrous lock, that
there was more hinge and lock than door.

But what was his astonishment when, coming bare-headed to the church,
and putting his hand into this dark nook, with a certain misgiving that
it might be unexpectedly seized, and a shivering propensity to draw it
back again, he found that the door, which opened outward, actually stood
ajar!

He thought, on the first surprise, of going back; or of getting a light,
or a companion; but his courage aided him immediately, and he determined
to ascend alone.

"What have I to fear?" said Trotty. "It's a church! Besides the ringers
may be there, and have forgotten to shut the door."

So he went in, feeling his way as he went, like a blind man; for it was
very dark. And very quiet, for the Chimes were silent.

The dust from the street had blown into the recess; and lying there,
heaped up, made it so soft and velvet-like to the foot, that there was
something startling even in that. The narrow stair was so close to the
door, too, that he stumbled at the very first; and shutting the door
upon himself by striking it with his foot, and causing it to rebound
back heavily, he couldn't open it again.

This was another reason, however, for going on. Trotty groped his way,
and went on. Up, up, up, and round and round; and up, up, up, higher,
higher, higher up!

Until, ascending through the floor, and pausing with his head just
raised above its beams, he came among the Bells. It was barely possible
to make out their great shapes in the gloom; but there they were.
Shadowy, and dark, and dumb.

A heavy sense of dread and loneliness fell instantly upon him, as he
climbed into this airy nest of stone and metal. His head went round and
round. He listened and then raised a wild "Halloa!"

Halloa! was mournfully protracted by the echoes.

Giddy, confused, and out of breath, and frightened, Toby looked about
him vacantly, and sunk down in a swoon.


THIRD QUARTER.

When and how the darkness of the night-black steeple changed to shining
light; and how the solitary tower was peopled with a myriad figures;
when and how the whispered "Haunt and hunt him," breathing monotonously
through his sleep or swoon, became a voice exclaiming in the waking ears
of Trotty, "Break his slumbers;" when and how he ceased to have a
sluggish and confused idea that such things were, companioning a host of
others that were not; there are no dates or means to tell. But, awake,
and standing on his feet upon the boards where he had lately lain, he
saw this Goblin Sight.

Then and not before, did Trotty see in every Bell a bearded figure of
the bulk and stature of the Bell--incomprehensibly, a figure and the
Bell itself. Gigantic, grave, and darkly watchful of him, as he stood
rooted to the ground.

Mysterious and awful figures! Resting on nothing; poised in the night
air of the tower, with their draped and hooded heads merged in the dim
roof; motionless and shadowy. Shadowy and dark, although he saw them by
some light belonging to themselves--none else was there--each with its
muffled hand upon its goblin mouth.

He could not plunge down wildly through the opening in the floor; for,
all power of motion had deserted him. Otherwise he would have done
so--ay, would have thrown himself, head-foremost, from the steeple-top,
rather than have seen them watching him with eyes that would have waked
and watched, although the pupils had been taken out.

A blast of air--how cold and shrill!--came moaning through the tower. As
it died away, the Great Bell, or the Goblin of the Great Bell, spoke.

"What visitor is this?" it said. The voice was low and deep, and Trotty
fancied that it sounded in the other figures as well.

"I thought my name was called by the Chimes!" said Trotty, raising his
hands in an attitude of supplication. "I hardly know why I am here, or
how I came. I have listened to the Chimes these many years. They have
cheered me often."

"And you have thanked them?" said the bell.

"A thousand times!" cried Trotty.

"How?"

"I am a poor man," faltered Trotty, "and could only thank them in
words."

"And always so?" inquired the Goblin of the Bell. "Have you never done
us wrong in words?"

"No!" cried Trotty, eagerly.

"Never done us foul, and false, and wicked wrong, in words?" pursued the
Goblin of the Bell.

Trotty was about to answer "Never!" But he stopped and was confused.

"The voice of Time," said the Phantom, "cries to man, Advance! Time is
for his advancement and improvement; for his greater worth, his greater
happiness, his better life; his progress onward to that goal within its
knowledge and its view, and set there, in the period when Time and he
began. Ages of darkness, wickedness, and violence, have come and
gone--millions uncountable, have suffered, lived, and died--to point
the way before him. Who seeks to turn him back, or stay him on his
course, arrests a mighty engine which will strike the meddler dead; and
be the fiercer and the wilder, ever, for its momentary check!"

"I never did so to my knowledge, sir," said Trotty. "It was quite by
accident if I did. I wouldn't go to do it, I'm sure."

"Who puts into the mouth of Time, or of its servants," said the Goblin
of the Bell, "a cry of lamentation for days which have had their trial
and their failure, and have left deep traces of it which the blind may
see--a cry that only serves the present time, by showing men how much it
needs their help when any ears can listen to regrets for such a
past--who does this, does a wrong. And you have done that wrong to us,
the Chimes."

Trotty's first excess of fear was gone. But he had felt tenderly and
gratefully toward the Bells, as you have seen; and when he heard himself
arraigned as one who had offended them so weightily, his heart was
touched with penitence and grief.

"If you knew," said Trotty, clasping his hands earnestly--"or perhaps
you do know--if you know how often you have kept me company; how often
you have cheered me up when I've been low; how you were quite the
plaything of my little daughter Meg (almost the only one she ever had)
when first her mother died, and she and me were left alone; you won't
bear malice for a hasty word!"

"Who hears in us, the Chimes, one note bespeaking disregard, or stern
regard, of any hope, or joy, or pain, or sorrow, of the many-sorrowed
throng; who hears us make response to any creed that gauges human
passions and affections, as it gauges the amount of miserable food on
which humanity may pine and wither; does us wrong. That wrong you have
done us!" said the Bell.

"I have!" said Trotty. "Oh, forgive me!"

"Spare me," cried Trotty, falling on his knees; "for Mercy's sake!"

"Listen!" said the Shadow.

"Listen!" cried the other Shadows.

"Listen!" said a clear and child-like voice, which Trotty thought he
recognized as having heard before.

The organ sounded faintly in the church below. Swelling by degrees, the
melody ascended to the roof, and filled the choir and nave. Expanding
more and more, it rose up, up, up, up; higher, higher, higher up;
awakening agitated hearts within the burly piles of oak, the hollow
bells, the iron-bound doors, the stairs of solid stone; until the tower
walls were insufficient to contain it, and it soared into the sky.

No wonder that an old man's breast could not contain a sound so vast and
mighty. It broke from that weak prison in a rush of tears; and Trotty
put his hands before his face.

"Listen!" said the Shadow.

"Listen!" said the other Shadows.

"Listen!" said the child's voice.

A solemn strain of blended voices rose into the tower.

It was a very low and mournful strain--a Dirge--and as he listened,
Trotty heard his child among the singers.

"She is dead!" exclaimed the old man. "Meg is dead. Her spirit calls to
me. I hear it!"

"The Spirit of your child bewails the dead, and mingles with the
dead--dead hopes, dead fancies, dead imaginings of youth," returned the
Bell, "but she is living. Learn from her life, a living truth. Learn
from the creature dearest to your heart, how bad the bad are born. See
every bud and leaf plucked one by one from off the fairest stem, and
know how bare and wretched it may be. Follow her! To desperation!"

Each of the shadowy figures stretched its right arm forth, and pointed
downward.

"The Spirit of the Chimes is your companion," said the figure. "Go! It
stands behind you!"

Trotty turned, and saw--the child! The child Will Fern had carried in
the street; the child whom Meg had watched, but now, asleep!

"I carried her myself, to-night," said Trotty. "In these arms!"

"Show him what he calls himself," said the dark figures, one and all.

The tower opened at his feet. He looked down, and beheld his own form,
lying at the bottom, on the outside: crushed and motionless.

"No more a living man!" cried Trotty. "Dead!"

"Dead!" said the figures altogether.

"Gracious Heaven! And the New Year--'

"Past," said the figures.

"What!" he cried, shuddering, "I missed my way, and coming on the
outside of this tower in the dark, fell down--a year ago?"

"Nine years ago!" replied the figures.

As they gave the answer, they recalled their outstretched hands; and
where their figures had been, there the Bells were.

"What are these?" he asked his guide. "If I am not mad, what are these?"

"Spirits of the Bells. Their sound upon the air," returned the child.
"They take such shapes and occupations as the hopes and thoughts of
mortals, and the recollections they have stored up, give them."

"And you," said Trotty, wildly. "What are you?"

"Hush, hush!" returned the child. "Look here!"

In a poor, mean room; working at the same kind of embroidery, which he
had often, often, seen before her; Meg, his own dear daughter, was
presented to his view. He made no effort to imprint his kisses on her
face; he did not strive to clasp her to his loving heart; he knew that
such endearments were, for him, no more. But he held his trembling
breath, and brushed away the blinding tears, that he might look upon
her; that he might only see her.

Ah! Changed. Changed. The light of the clear eye, how dimmed. The bloom,
how faded from the cheek. Beautiful she was, as she had ever been, but
Hope, Hope, Hope, oh, where was the fresh Hope that had spoken to him
like a voice!

She looked up from her work, at a companion. Following her eyes, the old
man started back.

In the woman grown, he recognized her at a glance. In the long silken
hair, he saw the self-same curls; around the lips, the child's
expression lingering still. See! In the eyes, now turned inquiringly on
Meg, there shone the very look that scanned those features when he
brought her home!

Then what was this, beside him?

Looking with awe into its face, he saw a something reigning there: a
lofty something, undefined and indistinct, which made it hardly more
than a remembrance of that child--as yonder figure might be--yet it was
the same: the same: and wore the dress.

Hark! They were speaking!

"Meg," said Lilian, hesitating. "How often you raise your head from your
work to look at me!"

"Are my looks so altered, that they frighten you?" asked Meg.

"Nay, dear! But you smile at that yourself! Why not smile when you look
at me, Meg?"

"I do so. Do I not?" she answered: smiling on her.

"Now you do," said Lilian, "but not usually. When you think I'm busy,
and don't see you, you look so anxious and so doubtful, that I hardly
like to raise my eyes. There is little cause for smiling in this hard
and toilsome life, but you were once so cheerful."

"Am I not now?" cried Meg, speaking in a tone of strange alarm, and
rising to embrace her. "Do _I_ make our weary life more weary to you,
Lilian?"

"You have been the only thing that made it life," said Lilian, fervently
kissing her; "sometimes the only thing that made me care to live so,
Meg. Such work, such work! So many hours, so many days, so many long,
long nights of hopeless, cheerless, never-ending work--not to heap up
riches, not to live grandly or gayly, not to live upon enough, however
coarse; but to earn bare bread; to scrape together just enough to toil
upon, and want upon, and keep alive in us the consciousness of our hard
fate! Oh, Meg, Meg!" she raised her voice and twined her arms about her
as she spoke, like one in pain. "How can the cruel world go round, and
bear to look upon such lives!"

"Lilly!" said Meg, soothing her, and putting back her hair from her wet
face. "Why, Lilly! You! So pretty and so young!"

"Oh, Meg!" she interrupted, holding her at arm's-length, and looking in
her face imploringly. "The worst of all! The worst of all! Strike me
old, Meg! Wither me and shrivel me, and free me from the dreadful
thoughts that tempt me in my youth!"

Trotty turned to look upon his guide. But, the Spirit of the child had
taken flight. Was gone.

       *       *       *       *       *


FOURTH QUARTER.

Some new remembrance of the ghostly figures in the Bells; some faint
impression of the ringing of the Chimes; some giddy consciousness of
having seen the swarm of phantoms reproduced and reproduced until the
recollection of them lost itself in the confusion of their numbers; some
hurried knowledge, how conveyed to him he knew not, that more years had
passed; and Trotty, with the Spirit of the child attending him, stood
looking on at mortal company.

Fat company, rosy-cheeked company, comfortable company. They were but
two, but they were red enough for ten. They sat before a bright fire,
with a small low table between them; and unless the fragrance of hot tea
and muffins lingered longer in that room than in most others, the table
had seen service very lately. But all the cups and saucers being clean,
and in their proper places in the corner cupboard; and the brass
toasting fork hanging in its usual nook, and spreading its four idle
fingers out, as if it wanted to be measured for a glove; there remained
no other visible tokens of the meal just finished, than such as purred
and washed their whiskers in the person of the basking cat, and
glistened in the gracious, not to say the greasy, faces of her patrons.

This cosy couple (married, evidently) had made a fair division of the
fire between them, and sat looking at the glowing sparks that dropped
into the grate; now nodding off into a doze; now waking up again when
some hot fragment, larger than the rest, came rattling down, as if the
fire were coming with it.

It was in no danger of sudden extinction, however; for it gleamed not
only in the little room, and on the panes of window-glass in the door,
and on the curtain half drawn across them, but in the little shop
beyond. A little shop, quite crammed and choked with the abundance of
its stock; a perfectly voracious little shop, with a maw as
accommodating and full as any shark's. Cheese, butter, firewood, soap,
pickles, matches, bacon, table-beer, peg-tops, sweetmeats, boys' kites,
bird-seed, cold ham, birch brooms, hearth-stones, salt, vinegar,
blacking, red herrings, stationery, lard, mushroom ketchup, stay-laces,
loaves of bread, shuttlecocks, eggs, and slate-pencils; everything was
fish that came to the net of this greedy little shop, and all articles
were in its net.

Glancing at such of these items as were visible in the shining of the
blaze, and the less cheerful radiance of two smoky lamps which burnt but
dimly in the shop itself, as though its plethora sat heavy on their
lungs; and glancing, then, at one of the two faces by the parlor-fire,
Trotty had small difficulty in recognizing in the stout old lady, Mrs.
Chickenstalker: always inclined to corpulency, even in the days when he
had known her as established in the general line, and having a small
balance against him in her books.

The features of her companion were less easy to him. The great broad
chin, with creases in it large enough to hide a finger in; the
astonished eyes, that seemed to expostulate with themselves for sinking
deeper and deeper into the yielding fat of the soft face; the nose
afflicted with that disordered action of its functions which is
generally termed The Snuffles; the short thick throat and laboring
chest, with other beauties of the like description, though calculated to
impress the memory, Trotty could at first allot to nobody he had ever
known: and yet he had some recollection of them too. At length, in Mrs.
Chickenstalker's partner in the general line, and in the crooked and
eccentric line of life, he recognized the former porter of Sir Joseph
Bowley; an apoplectic innocent, who had connected himself in Trotty's
mind with Mrs. Chickenstalker years ago, by giving him admission to the
mansion where he had confessed his obligations to that lady, and drawn
on his unlucky head such grave reproach.

Trotty had little interest in a change like this, after the changes he
had seen; but association is very strong sometimes; and he looked
involuntarily behind the parlor-door, where the accounts of credit
customers were usually kept in chalk. There was no record of his name.
Some names were there, but they were strange to him, and infinitely
fewer than of old; from which he argued that the porter was an advocate
of ready money transactions, and on coming into the business had looked
pretty sharp after the Chickenstalker defaulters.

So desolate was Trotty, and so mournful for the youth and promise of his
blighted child, that it was a sorrow to him, even to have no place in
Mrs. Chickenstalker's ledger.

"What sort of a night is it, Anne?" inquired the former porter of Sir
Joseph Bowley, stretching out his legs before the fire, and rubbing as
much of them as his short arms could reach; with an air that added,
"Here I am if it's bad, and I don't want to go out if it's good."

"Hard weather indeed," returned his wife, shaking her head.

"Ay, ay! Years," said Mr. Tugby, "are like Christians in that respect.
Some of 'em die hard; some of 'em die easy. This one hasn't many days to
run, and is making a fight for it. I like him all the better. There's a
customer, my love!"

Attentive to the rattling door, Mrs. Tugby had already risen.

"Now, then!" said that lady, passing out into the little shop. "What's
wanted? Oh! I beg your pardon, sir, I'm sure. I didn't think it was
you."

She made this apology to a gentleman in black, who, with his wristbands
tucked up, and his hat cocked loungingly on one side, and his hand in
his pocket, sat down astride on the table-beer barrel, and nodded in
return.

"This is a bad business up-stairs, Mrs. Tugby," said the gentleman.
"The man can't live."

"Not the back-attic can't!" cried Tugby, coming out into the shop to
join the conference.

"The back-attic, Mr. Tugby," said the gentleman, "is coming down-stairs
fast, and will be below the basement very soon."

Looking by turns at Tugby and his wife, he sounded the barrel with his
knuckles for the depth of beer, and having found it, played a tune upon
the empty part.

"The back-attic, Mr. Tugby," said the gentleman: Tugby having stood in
silent consternation for some time; "is Going."

"Then," said Tugby, turning to his wife, "he must Go, you know, before
he's Gone."

"I don't think you can move him," said the gentleman, shaking his head.
"I wouldn't take the responsibility of saying it could be done, myself.
You had better leave him where he is. He can't live long."

"It's the only subject," said Tugby, bringing the butter-scale down upon
the counter with a crash, by weighing his fist on it, "that we've ever
had a word upon; she and me; and look what it comes to! He's going to
die here, after all. Going to die upon the premises. Going to die in our
house!"

"And where should he have died, Tugby?" cried his wife.

"In the workhouse," he returned. "What are workhouses made for?"

"Not for that!" said Mrs. Tugby, with great energy. "Not for that!
Neither did I marry you for that. Don't think it, Tugby. I won't have
it. I won't allow it. I'd be separated first, and never see your face
again. When my widow's name stood over that door, as it did for many,
many years: the house being known as Mrs. Chickenstalker's far and
wide, and never known but to its honest credit and its good report: when
my widow's name stood over that door, Tugby, I knew him as a handsome,
steady, manly, independent youth; I knew her as the sweetest looking,
sweetest tempered girl, eyes ever saw; I knew her father (poor old
creetur, he fell down from the steeple walking in his sleep, and killed
himself), for the simplest, hardest working, childest-hearted man, that
ever drew the breath of life; and when I turn them out of house and
home, may angels turn me out of heaven. As they would! And serve me
right!"

Her old face, which had been a plump and dimpled one before the changes
which had come to pass, seemed to shine out of her as she said these
words; and when she dried her eyes, and shook her head and her
handkerchief at Tugby, with an expression of firmness which it was quite
clear was not to be easily resisted, Trotty said, "Bless her! Bless
her!"

Then he listened, with a panting heart, for what should follow. Knowing
nothing yet, but that they spoke of Meg.

The gentleman upon the table-beer cask, who appeared to be some
authorized medical attendant upon the poor, was far too well accustomed,
evidently, to little differences of opinion between man and wife, to
interpose any remark in this instance. He sat softly whistling, and
turning little drops of beer out of the tap upon the ground, until there
was a perfect calm: when he raised his head and said to Mrs. Tugby, late
Chickenstalker:

"There's something interesting about the woman, even now. How did she
come to marry him?"

"Why, that," said Mrs. Tugby, taking a seat near him, "is not the least
cruel part of her story, sir. You see they kept company, she and
Richard, many years ago. When they were a young and beautiful couple,
everything was settled, and they were to have been married on a New
Year's Day. But, somehow, Richard got it into his head, through what the
gentleman told him, that he might do better, and that he'd soon repent
it, and that she wasn't good enough for him, and that a young man of
spirit had no business to be married. And the gentleman frightened her,
and made her melancholy, and timid of his deserting her, and of her
children coming to the gallows, and of its being wicked to be man and
wife, and a good deal more of it. And in short, they lingered and
lingered, and their trust in one another was broken, and so at last was
the match. But the fault was his. She would have married him, sir,
joyfully. I've seen her heart swell, many times afterwards, when he
passed her in a proud and careless way; and never did a woman grieve
more truly for a man, than she for Richard when he first went wrong."

"Oh! he went wrong, did he?" said the gentleman, pulling out the
vent-peg of the table-beer, and trying to peep down into the barrel
through the hole.

"Well, sir, I don't know that he rightly understood himself, you see. I
think his mind was troubled by their having broke with one another; and
that but for being ashamed before the gentlemen, and perhaps for being
uncertain too, how she might take it, he'd have gone through any
suffering or trial to have had Meg's promise, and Meg's hand again.
That's my belief. He never said so; more's the pity! He took to
drinking, idling, bad companions: all the fine resources that were to be
so much better for him than the Home he might have had. He lost his
looks, his character, his health, his strength, his friends, his work:
everything!"

"He didn't lose everything, Mrs. Tugby," returned the gentleman,
"because he gained a wife; and I want to know how he gained her."

"I'm coming to it, sir, in a moment. This went on for years and years;
he sinking lower and lower; she enduring, poor thing, miseries enough to
wear her life away. At last he was so cast down, and cast out, that no
one would employ or notice him; and doors were shut upon him, go where
he would. Applying from place to place, and door to door; and coming for
the hundredth time to one gentleman, who had often and often tried him
(he was a good workman to the very end); that gentleman, who knew his
history, said, 'I believe you are incorrigible; there's only one person
in the world who has a chance of reclaiming you; ask me to trust you no
more, until she tries to do it.' Something like that, in his anger and
vexation."

"Ah!" said the gentleman. "Well?"

"Well, sir, he went to her, and kneeled to her; said it was so; said it
ever had been so; and made a prayer to her to save him."

"And she?--Don't distress yourself, Mrs. Tugby."

"She came to me that night to ask me about living here. 'What he was
once to me,' she said, 'is buried in a grave, side by side with what I
was to him. But I have thought of this; and I will make the trial. In
the hope of saving him; for the love of the light-hearted girl (you
remember her) who was to have been married on a New Year's Day; and for
the love of her Richard.' And he said he had come to her from Lilian,
and Lilian had trusted to him, and she never could forget that. So they
were married; and when they came home here, and I saw them, I hoped that
such prophecies as parted them when they were young, may not often
fulfill themselves as they did in this case, or I wouldn't be the
makers of them for a Mine of Gold."

The gentleman got off the cask, and stretched himself, observing:

"I suppose he used her ill, as soon as they were married?"

"I don't think he ever did that," said Mrs. Tugby, shaking her head and
wiping her eyes. "He went on better for a short time; but, his habits
were too old and strong to be got rid of; he soon fell back a little;
and was falling fast back, when his illness came so strong upon him. I
think he has always felt for her. I am sure he has. I've seen him in his
crying fits and tremblings, try to kiss her hand; and I have heard him
call her 'Meg,' and say it was her nineteenth birthday. There he has
been lying, now, these weeks and months. Between him and her baby, she
has not been able to do her old work; and by not being able to be
regular, she has lost it, even if she could have done it. How they have
lived, I hardly know!"

"_I_ know," muttered Mr. Tugby, looking at the till, and round the shop,
and at his wife; and rolling his head with immense intelligence.

He was interrupted by a cry--a sound of lamentation--from the upper
story of the house. The gentleman moved hurriedly to the door.

"My friend," he said, looking back, "you needn't discuss whether he
shall be removed or not. He has spared you that trouble, I believe."

Saying so, he ran up-stairs, followed by Mrs. Tugby; while Mr. Tugby
panted and grumbled after them at leisure: being rendered more than
commonly short-winded by the weight of the till, in which there had been
an inconvenient quantity of copper. Trotty, with the child beside him,
floated up the staircase like mere air.

"Follow her! Follow her! Follow her!" He heard the ghostly voices in
the Bells repeat their words as he ascended. "Learn it, from the
creature dearest to your heart!"

It was over. It was over. And this was she, her father's pride and joy!
This haggard, wretched woman, weeping by the bed, if it deserved that
name, and pressing to her breast, and hanging down her head upon, an
infant? Who can tell how spare, how sickly, and how poor an infant? Who
can tell how dear?

"Thank God!" cried Trotty, holding up his folded hands. "O, God be
thanked! She loves her child!"

Again Trotty heard the voices, saying, "Follow her!" He turned toward
his guide, and saw it rising from him, passing through the air. "Follow
her!" it said. And vanished.

He hovered round her; sat down at her feet; looked up into her face for
one trace of her old self; listened for one note of her old pleasant
voice. He flitted round the child: so wan, so prematurely old, so
dreadful in its gravity, so plaintive in its feeble, mournful, miserable
wail. He almost worshiped it. He clung to it as her only safeguard; as
the last unbroken link that bound her to endurance. He set his father's
hope and trust on the frail baby; watched her every look upon it as she
held it in her arms; and cried a thousand times, "She loves it! God be
thanked, she loves it!"

He saw the woman tend her in the night; return to her when her grudging
husband was asleep, and all was still; encourage her, shed tears with
her, set nourishment before her. He saw the day come, and the night
again; the day, the night; the time go by; the house of death relieved
of death; the room left to herself and to the child; he heard it moan
and cry; he saw it harass her, and tire her out, and when she slumbered
in exhaustion, drag her back to consciousness, and hold her with its
little hands upon the rack; but she was constant to it, gentle with it,
patient with it. Patient! Was its loving mother in her inmost heart and
soul, and had its Being knitted up with hers as when she carried it
unborn.

All this time, she was in want: languishing away, in dire and pining
want. With the baby in her arms, she wandered here and there in quest of
occupation; and with its thin face lying in her lap, and looking up in
hers, did any work for any wretched sum: a day and night of labor for as
many farthings as there were figures on the dial. If she had quarreled
with it; if she had neglected it; if she had looked upon it with a
moment's hate! if, in the frenzy of an instant, she had struck it! No!
His comfort was, She loved it always.

She told no one of her extremity, and wandered abroad in the day lest
she should be questioned by her only friend: for any help she received
from her hands, occasioned fresh disputes between the good woman and her
husband; and it was new bitterness to be the daily cause of strife and
discord, where she owed so much.

She loved it still. She loved it more and more. But a change fell on the
aspect of her love.

One night she was singing faintly to it in its sleep and walking to and
fro to hush it, when her door was softly opened, and a man looked in.

"For the last time," he said.

"William Fern!"

"For the last time."

He listened like a man pursued: and spoke in whispers.

"Margaret, my race is nearly run, I couldn't finish it, without a
parting word with you. Without one grateful word."

"What have you done?" she asked: regarding him with terror.

He looked at her but gave no answer.

After a short silence, he made a gesture with his hand, as if he set her
question by; as if he brushed it aside; and said:

"It's long ago, Margaret, now; but that night is as fresh in my memory
as ever 'twas. We little thought then," he added, looking round, "that
we should ever meet like this. Your child, Margaret? Let me have it in
my arms. Let me hold your child."

He put his hat upon the floor, and took it. And he trembled as he took
it, from head to foot.

"Is it a girl?"

"Yes."

He put his hand before its little face.

"See how weak I'm grown, Margaret, when I want the courage to look at
it! Let her be, a moment. I won't hurt her. It's long ago, but--What's
her name?"

"Margaret," she answered quickly.

"I'm glad of that," he said. "I'm glad of that!"

He seemed to breathe more freely; and after pausing for an instant, took
away his hand, and looked upon the infant's face. But covered it again,
immediately.

"Margaret!" he said; and gave her back the child. "It's Lilian's."

"Lilian's!"

"I held the same face in my arms when Lilian's mother died and left
her."

"When Lilian's mother died and left her!" she repeated, wildly.

"How shrill you speak! Why do you fix your eyes upon me so? Margaret!"

She sunk down in a chair, and pressed the infant to her breast, and wept
over it. Sometimes, she released it from her embrace, to look anxiously
in its face: then strained it to her bosom again. At those times, when
she gazed upon it, then it was that something fierce and terrible began
to mingle with her love. Then it was that her old father quailed.

"Follow her!" was sounded through the house. "Learn it, from the
creature dearest to your heart!"

"Margaret," said Fern, bending over her, and kissing her upon the brow:
"I thank you for the last time. Good night. Good bye! Put your hand in
mine, and tell me you'll forget me from this hour, and try to think the
end of me was here."

She called to him; but he was gone. She sat down stupefied, until her
infant roused her to a sense of hunger, cold, and darkness. She paced
the room with it the livelong night, hushing it and soothing it. She
said at intervals, "Like Lilian when her mother died and left her!" Why
was her step so quick, her eyes so wild, her love so fierce and
terrible, whenever she repeated those words?

"But, it is Love," said Trotty. "It is Love. She'll never cease to love
it. My poor Meg!"

She dressed the child next morning with unusual care--ah, vain
expenditure of care upon such squalid robes!--and once more tried to
find some means of life. It was the last day of the Old Year. She tried
till night, and never broke her fast. She tried in vain.

She mingled with an abject crowd, who tarried in the snow, until it
pleased some officer appointed to dispense the public charity (the
lawful charity; not that once preached upon a Mount), to call them in,
and question them, and say to this one, "Go to such a place," to that
one, "Come next week;" to make a foot-ball of another wretch, and pass
him here and there, from hand to hand, from house to house, until he
wearied and lay down to die; or started up and robbed, and so became a
higher sort of criminal, whose claims allowed of no delay. Here, too,
she failed.

She loved her child, and wished to have it lying on her breast. And that
was quite enough.

It was night: a bleak, dark, cutting night: when pressing the child
close to her for warmth, she arrived outside the house she called her
home. She was so faint and giddy, that she saw no one standing in the
doorway until she was close upon it, and about to enter. Then, she
recognized the master of the house, who had so disposed himself--with
his person it was not difficult--as to fill up the whole entry.

"Oh!" he said softly. "You have come back?"

She looked at the child and shook her head.

"Don't you think you have lived here long enough without paying any
rent? Don't you think that, without any money, you've been a pretty
constant customer at this shop, now?" said Mr. Tugby.

She repeated the same mute appeal.

"Suppose you try and deal somewhere else," he said. "And suppose you
provide yourself with another lodging. Come! Don't you think you could
manage it?"

She said, in a low voice, that it was very late. To-morrow.

"Now I see what you want," said Tugby; "and what you mean. You know
there are two parties in this house about you, and you delight in
setting them by the ears. I don't want any quarrels; I'm speaking softly
to avoid a quarrel; but if you don't go away, I'll speak out loud, and
you shall cause words loud enough to please you. But you shan't come in,
that I am determined."

She put her hair back with her hand, and looked in a sudden manner at
the sky, and the dark lowering distance.

"This is the last night of an Old Year, and I won't carry ill-blood and
quarrelings and disturbances into a New One, to please you nor anybody
else," said Tugby, who was quite a retail Friend and Father. "I wonder
you an't ashamed of yourself, to carry such practices into a New Year.
If you haven't any business in the world, but to be always giving way,
and always making disturbances between man and wife, you'd be better out
of it. Go along with you!"

"Follow her! To desperation!"

Again the old man heard the voices. Looking up, he saw the figures
hovering in the air, and pointing where she went, down the dark street.

"She loves it!" he exclaimed in agonized entreaty for her. "Chimes! she
loves it still!"

"Follow her!" The shadows swept upon the track she had taken like a
cloud.

Oh, for something to awaken her! For any sight or sound, or scent, to
call up tender recollections in a brain on fire! For any gentle image of
the Past, to rise up before her!

"I was her father! I was her father!" cried the old man, stretching out
his hands to the dark shadows flying on above. "Have mercy on her, and
on me! Where does she go? Turn her back! I was her father!"

But, they only pointed to her, as she hurried on; "To desperation! Learn
it from the creature dearest to your heart!"

A hundred voices echoed it. The air was made of breath expended in those
words. He seemed to take them in, at every gasp he drew. They were
everywhere, and not to be escaped. And still she hurried on; the same
light in her eyes.

All at once she stopped.

"Now, turn her back!" exclaimed the old man, tearing his white hair. "My
child! Meg! Turn her back! Great Father, turn her back!"

In her own scanty shawl, she wrapped the baby warm. With her fevered
hands, she smoothed its limbs, composed its face, arranged its mean
attire. In her wasted arms she folded it, as though she never would
resign it more. And with her dry lips, kissed it in a final pang, and
last long agony of Love.

Putting its tiny hand up to her neck, and holding it there, within her
dress, next to her distracted heart, she set its sleeping face against
her: closely, steadily against her: and sped onward to the river.

To the rolling River, swift and dim, where Winter Night sat brooding
like the last dark thoughts of many who had sought a refuge there before
her. Where scattered lights upon the banks gleamed sullen, red and dull,
as torches that were burning there to show the way to Death. Where no
abode of living people cast its shadow, on the deep, impenetrable,
melancholy shade.

To the River! To that portal of Eternity, her desperate footsteps tended
with the swiftness of its rapid waters running to the sea. He tried to
touch her as she passed him, going down to its dark level; but, the wild
distempered form, the fierce and terrible love, the desperation that had
left all human check or hold behind, swept by him like the wind.

He followed her. She paused a moment on the brink, before the dreadful
plunge. He fell down on his knees, and in a shriek addressed the figures
in the Bells now hovering above them.

"Have mercy on her!" he exclaimed, "as one in whom this dreadful crime
has sprung from Love perverted; from the strongest, deepest Love we
fallen creatures know! Think what her misery must have been, when such
seed bears such fruit. Heaven meant her to be good. There is no loving
mother on the earth who might not come to this, if such a life had gone
before. Oh, have mercy on my child, who, even at this pass, means mercy
to her own, and dies herself, and perils her immortal soul, to save
it!"

She was in his arms. He held her now. His strength was like a giant's.

He might have said more; but the Bells, the old familiar Bells, his own
dear, constant, steady friends, the Chimes, began to ring the joy-peals
for a New Year; so lustily, so merrily, so happily, so gayly, that he
leapt upon his feet, and broke the spell that bound him.

       *       *       *       *       *

"And whatever you do, father," said Meg, "don't eat tripe again without
asking some doctor whether it's likely to agree with you; for how you
_have_ been going on, Good gracious!"

She was working with her needle at the little table by the fire,
dressing her simple gown with ribbons for her wedding. So quietly happy,
so blooming and youthful, so full of beautiful promise, that he uttered
a great cry as if it were an Angel in his house; then flew to clasp her
in his arms.

But he caught his feet in the newspaper, which had fallen on the hearth,
and somebody came rushing in between them.

"No!" cried the voice of this same somebody; a generous and jolly voice
it was. "Not even you. Not even you. The first kiss of Meg in the New
Year is mine. Mine! I have been waiting outside the house this hour to
hear the Bells and claim it. Meg, my precious prize, a happy year! A
life of happy years, my darling wife!"

And Richard smothered her with kisses.

You never in all your life saw anything like Trotty after this. I don't
care where you have lived or what you have seen, you never in all your
life saw anything at all approaching him! He sat down in his chair and
beat his knees and cried; he sat down in his chair and beat his knees
and laughed; he sat down in his chair and beat his knees and laughed and
cried together; he got out of his chair and hugged Meg; he got out of
his chair and hugged Richard; he got out of his chair and hugged them
both at once; he kept running up to Meg and squeezing her fresh face
between his hands and kissing it, going from her backward not to lose
sight of it, and running up again like a figure in a magic lantern; and
whatever he did, he was constantly sitting himself down in this chair,
and never stopping in it for one single moment, being--that's the
truth--beside himself with joy.

"And to-morrow's your wedding-day, my pet!" cried Trotty. "Your real,
happy wedding-day!"

"To-day!" cried Richard, shaking hands with him. "To-day. The Chimes are
ringing in the New Year. Hear them!"

They WERE ringing! Bless their sturdy hearts, they WERE ringing! Great
Bells as they were; melodious, deep-mouthed, noble Bells; cast in no
common metal; made by no common founder; when had they ever chimed like
that before?

"But to-day, my pet," said Trotty. "You and Richard had some words
to-day."

"Because he's such a bad fellow, father," said Meg. "An't you, Richard?
Such a headstrong, violent man! He'd have made no more of speaking his
mind to that great Alderman, and putting _him_ down I don't know where,
than he would of--"

"--Kissing Meg," suggested Richard. Doing it, too.

"No. Not a bit more," said Meg. "But I wouldn't let him, father. Where
would have been the use?"

"Richard, my boy!" cried Trotty. "You was turned up Trumps originally,
and Trumps you must be until you die! But you were crying by the fire
to-night, my pet, when I came home. Why did you cry by the fire?"

"I was thinking of the years we've passed together, father. Only that.
And thinking you might miss me, and be lonely."

Trotty was backing off to that extraordinary chair again, when the
child, who had been awakened by the noise, came running in, half
dressed.

"Why, here she is!" cried Trotty catching her up. "Here's little Lilian!
Ha, ha, ha! Here we are and here we go! O, here we are and here we go
again! And here we are and here we go! And Uncle Will, too!" Stopping in
his trot to greet him heartily. "O, Uncle Will, the vision that I've had
to-night, through lodging you! O, Uncle Will, the obligations that
you've laid me under by your coming, my good friend!"

Before Will Fern could make the least reply, a band of music burst into
the room, attended by a flock of neighbors, screaming: "A Happy New
Year, Meg!" "A Happy Wedding!" "Many of 'em!" and other fragmentary good
wishes of that sort. The Drum (who was a private friend of Trotty's)
then stepped forward and said:

"Trotty Veck, my boy! It's got about that your daughter is going to be
married to-morrow. There an't a soul that knows you that don't wish you
well, or that knows her and don't wish her well. Or that knows you both
and don't wish you both all the happiness the New Year can bring. And
here we are, to play it in accordingly."

"What a happiness it is, I'm sure," said Trotty, "to be so esteemed. How
kind and neighborly you are! It's all along of my dear daughter. She
deserves it."

At this moment a combination of prodigious sounds was heard outside, and
a good-humored, comely woman of some fifty years of age, or thereabouts,
came running in, closely followed by the marrow-bones and cleavers and
the bells--not _the_ Bells, but a portable collection on a frame.

Trotty said: "It's Mrs. Chickenstalker!" And sat down and beat his knees
again.

"Married, and not tell me, Meg!" cried the good woman. "Never! I
couldn't rest on the last night of the Old Year without coming to wish
you joy. I couldn't have done it, Meg. Not if I had been bed-ridden. So
here I am."

"Mrs. Tugby," said Trotty, who had been going round and round her in an
ecstasy--"I _should_ say Chickenstalker--bless your heart and soul! A
happy New Year, and many of 'em! Mrs. Tugby," said Trotty, when he had
saluted her--"I _should_ say Chickenstalker--this is William Fern and
Lilian."

The worthy dame, to his surprise, turned very pale and very red.

"Not Lilian Fern, whose mother died in Dorsetshire?" said she.

Her uncle answered "Yes," and meeting hastily they exchanged some
hurried words together, of which the upshot was that Mrs. Chickenstalker
shook him by both hands, saluted Trotty on his cheek again of her own
free will, and took the child to her capacious breast.

"Will Fern," said Trotty, pulling on his right-hand muffler. "Not the
friend that you was hoping to find?"

"Ay," returned Will, putting a hand on each of Trotty's shoulders. "And
like to prove a'most as good a friend, if that can be, as one I found."

"O!" said Trotty. "Please to play up there. Will you have the goodness?"

Had Trotty dreamed? Or are his joys and sorrows, and the actors in them,
but a dream; himself a dream; the teller of this tale a dreamer, waking
but now? If it be so, O listener, dear to him in all his visions, try to
bear in mind the stern realities from which these shadows come; and in
your sphere--none is too wide and none too limited for such an
end--endeavor to correct, improve and soften them. So may the New Year
be a happy one to you, happy to many more whose happiness depends on
you! So may each year be happier than the last, and not the meanest of
our brethren or sisterhood debarred their rightful share in what our
great Creator formed them to enjoy.
